Massachusetts, session 194th, H4086.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The division of highways within the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, established pursuant to section 37 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, shall
conduct a study over 3 years on the steps necessary to protect vulnerable habitats, especially
wetlands and waterways, along state highways. The study shall include an analysis of: (i) the
drainage infrastructure along state highways; (ii) the presence of harmful contaminants from road
surfaces and road construction in stormwater along state highways; (iii) the level and type of
pollution in habitats resulting from drainage from state highways; and (iv) potential mitigation
strategies to reduce and eventually eliminate pollution caused by state highway drainage.
SECTION 2. Not later than June 30, 2028, the division of highways shall submit its
report containing the results of the study conducted pursuant to section 1, together with any
proposed legislative or regulatory changes, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the
of 2

senate, the joint committee on transportation and the joint committee on environment and natural
resources.
of 2